Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB479.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1556. Moment of Silence on January 6 Anniversary.--(a) Each school entity shall conduct a moment of silence during instructional hours for students and faculty to observe the anniversary of January 6, 2021, as a remembrance of the individuals who lost their lives or were wounded by insurrectionist attacks on that date.(b) The Department of Education shall establish a model curriculum for instruction in the events and significance of January 6, 2021, no later than twelve (12) months after the 1234567891011121314151617181920 effective date of this section. The model curriculum shall include all of the following where appropriate:(1) The historical context of the January 6 attacks.(2) The insurrectionist attacks on the United States Capitol.(3) United States Government response to the attacks.(4) Challenges and consequences in a post-January 6 world.(c) The Department of Education shall make available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website curriculum materials and other available resources regarding the events and significance of January 6, 2021, for voluntary use by school entities.(d) Nothing in subsections (b) and (c) shall be construed to require a school entity or nonpublic school to implement, adopt or use the curriculum, materials and other resources made available by the Department of Education under this section.(e) For purposes of this section, the term "school entity" shall mean a school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0479PN0464 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021